Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-917
Applicant or recipient; failure to cooperate; effect.

Refusal by the applicant or recipient specified in section 68-916 to cooperate in obtaining reimbursement for medical care or services provided to himself or herself or any other member of the assistance group renders the applicant or recipient ineligible for assistance. Ineligibility shall continue for so long as such person refuses to cooperate. Cooperation may be waived by the department upon a determination of the reasonable likelihood of physical or emotional harm to the applicant, recipient, or other member of the assistance group if the applicant or recipient were to cooperate. Eligibility shall continue for any individual who cannot legally assign his or her own rights and who would have been eligible for assistance but for the refusal by another person, legally able to assign such individual's rights, to cooperate as required by this section.

Laws 1984, LB 723, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 108;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 68-1027;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 17.